Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.820

Department of ecology—Waste-derived or micronutrient fertilizer—Standards—Written decision—Appeal of decision.

(1) After receipt from the department of the completed application required by RCW 15.54.325, the department of ecology shall evaluate whether the use of the proposed waste-derived fertilizer or the micronutrient fertilizer as defined in RCW 15.54.270 is consistent with the following:

(a) Chapter 70A.205 RCW, the solid waste management act;

(b) Chapter 70A.300 RCW, the hazardous waste management act; and

(c) 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq., the resource conservation and recovery act.

(2) The department of ecology shall apply the standards adopted in RCW 15.54.800. If more stringent standards apply under chapter 173-303 WAC for the same constituents, the department of ecology must use the more stringent standards.

(3) Within sixty days of receiving the completed application, the department of ecology shall advise the department as to whether the application complies with the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section. In making a determination, the department of ecology shall consult with the department of health and the department of labor and industries.

(4) A party aggrieved by a decision of the department of ecology to issue a written approval under this section or to deny the issuance of such an approval may appeal the decision to the pollution control hearings board within thirty days of the decision. Review of such a decision shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 43.21B RCW. Any subsequent appeal of a decision of the hearings board shall be obtained in accordance with RCW 43.21B.180.

[ 2020 c 20 s 1003; 1998 c 36 s 16.]

NOTES:

Short title—1998 c 36: See note following RCW 15.54.265.